Missouri, session 2026, HB2976.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 334.031, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 334.031, to read as follows:
334.031. 1. (1) Candidates for licenses as physicians and surgeons shall furnish
[satisfactory evidence of their good moral character, and their preliminary qualifications, to
wit: a certificate of graduation from an accredited high school or its equivalent, and
satisfactory evidence of completion of preprofessional education consisting of a minimum of
sixty semester hours of college credits in acceptable subjects leading towards the degree of
bachelor of arts or bachelor of science from an accredited college or university. They shall
also furnish satisfactory evidence of having attended throughout at least four terms of thirty-
two weeks of actual instructions in each term and of having received a diploma from some
reputable medical college or osteopathic college that enforces requirements of four terms of
thirty-two weeks for actual instruction in each term, including, in addition to class work, such
experience in operative and hospital work during the last two years of instruction as is
required by the American Medical Association and the American Osteopathic Association
before the college is approved and accredited as reputable. Any medical college approved
and accredited as reputable by the American Medical Association or the Liaison Committee
on Medical Education and any osteopathic college approved and accredited as reputable by
the American Osteopathic Association is deemed to have complied with the requirements of
this subsection]:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2976 2
(a) Evidence of good moral character by submitting to a criminal background
check as provided in section 43.540;
(b) Either:
a. A diploma and academic transcripts from a school accredited by the Liaison
Committee on Medical Education, the Commission on Osteopathic College
Accreditation, or a similar accrediting agency or from some reputable medical college
or osteopathic college; or
b. A valid certificate from the Educational Commission for Foreign Medical
Graduates (ECFMG); and
(c) A certificate demonstrating that the applicant has satisfied the requirements
of section 334.035 relating to postgraduate training. An applicant who holds a valid
certificate issued by the ECFMG shall submit satisfactory evidence of successful
completion of two years of such training.
(2) Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section, the board shall not require
applicants to provide information in addition to the information the applicant is
required to furnish under this subsection.
2. In determining the qualifications necessary for licensure as a qualified physician
and surgeon, the board, by rule and regulation, may accept the certificate of the National
Board of Medical Examiners of the United States, chartered pursuant to the laws of the
District of Columbia, of the National Board of Examiners for Osteopathic Physicians and
Surgeons chartered pursuant to the laws of the state of Indiana, or of the Licentiate of the
Medical Counsel of Canada (LMCC) in lieu of and as equivalent to its own professional
examination. Every applicant for a license on the basis of such certificate, upon making
application showing necessary qualifications as provided in subsection 1 of this section, shall
be required to pay the same fee required of applicants to take the examination before the
board.
3. The board may require applicants to list all licenses to practice as a physician
currently or previously held in any other state, territory, or country and to disclose any
past or pending investigations, discipline, or sanctions against each such license.
4. In addition to the criminal background screening required by this section, the
board may obtain a report on the applicant from the National Practitioner Data Bank
or the Federation of State Medical Boards.
✔